Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin School safety facility grants. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Public Safety's School Safety Center may award school safety grants to qualifying schools to enhance school safety for students and staff. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "qualifying school" means a school operated by a school district, charter school, cooperative unit defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2, Tribal contract school, or nonpublic school. new text end new text begin (c) A school safety grant must be used for items authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin A qualifying school may apply for a school safety grant in the form and manner specified by the School Safety Center in consultation with the commissioner of education. A qualifying school's application must include information on the other sources of funding, if any, that will be used to fully fund the school safety project. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant awards. new text end new text begin After consultation with the commissioner of education, the Department of Public Safety's School Safety Center may award a school safety grant of no more than $500,000 to each qualifying school. The School Safety Center must consult with the commissioner of education on how to prioritize grant applications. At least half of the grants must be awarded to schools with administrative offices located outside of the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Public Safety's School Safety Center for school safety grants awarded under this section. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end